West Virginia, session 2025, HB2265.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 20, 2024, authorized under the authority of §19-12F-5 of this code, relating to the Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner (retail enforcement of select plant-based derivatives and derivative products, including hemp and kratom, 175 CSR 11), is authorized.